Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.460

Heating oils—Delivery tickets—Statements.

(1) All stove and furnace oil shall be sold by liquid measure or by weight in accordance with the provisions of RCW 19.94.340.

(2) Unless such fuel is delivered to the purchaser in package form, each delivery of such fuel in an amount greater than ten gallons in the case of sale by liquid measure or one hundred pounds in the case of sale by weight must be accompanied by a delivery ticket or a written statement on which, in ink or other indelible substance, there shall be clearly and legibly stated:

(a) The name and address of the vendor;

(b) The name and address of the purchaser;

(c) The identity of the type of fuel comprising the delivery;

(d) The unit price (that is, price per gallon or per pound, as the case may be), of the fuel delivered;

(e) In the case of sale by liquid measure, the liquid volume of the delivery together with any meter readings from which such liquid volume has been computed, expressed in terms of the gallon and its binary or decimal subdivisions; and

(f) In the case of sale by weight, the net weight of the delivery, together with any weighing scale readings from which such net weight has been computed, expressed in terms of tons or pounds avoirdupois.

(3) The delivery ticket required under this section must be delivered at the time of delivery unless an agreement, written or otherwise, between the vendor and the purchaser has been reached regarding the delivery of such delivery ticket.

[ 1992 c 237 s 29; 1969 c 67 s 46.]